West Virginia, session 2025, HB3261.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 7. registered Professional nurses. §30-7-15. Administration of anesthetics. In any case where it is lawful for a duly licensed physician or dentist practicing medicine or dentistry under the laws of this state to administer anesthetics, such anesthetics may lawfully be given and administered by any person (a) who has been licensed to practice registered professional nursing under this article, and (b) who holds a diploma or certificate evidencing his or her successful completion of the educational program of a school of anesthesia duly accredited by the American association of nurse anesthetists: Provided, That such anesthesia is administered by such person in the presence and under the supervision of such physician or dentist.(a) The administration of anesthesia may be provided by a certified registered nurse anesthetist in cooperation with a physician, a dentist, a podiatrist, an advanced practice registered nurse and/or a physician assistant when providing anesthesia services. An act involving the determination, preparation, administration, or monitoring of anesthesia care and anesthesia care-related services may be lawfully provided by a certified registered nurse anesthetist who:(1) Has been licensed to practice registered professional nursing under this article.(2) Is licensed as an advanced practice registered nurse under this article.(3) Has successfully completed the educational program of a school for nurse anesthetists of a nationally accredited graduate or post-graduate advanced practice registered nurse educational program.(4) Hold current certification by a national certifying body recognized by the Board of Nursing in the advanced practice registered nurse role and population foci appropriate for educational preparation.(b) For purposes of this section, cooperation means a process in which the certified registered nurse anesthetist and the physician, a dentist, a podiatrist, an advanced practice registered nurse, and/or a physician assistant work together with each contributing an area of expertise, at their individual and respective levels of education and training. (c) A certified registered nurse anesthetist shall consult with other health care providers when engaging in chronic pain practice.(d) A physician, a dentist, a podiatrist, an advanced practice registered nurse, and/or a physician assistant is not liable for any act or omission of a certified registered nurse anesthetist who orders or administers anesthetics under this section.(e) A licensed advanced practice registered nurse practicing in the role of certified registered nurse anesthetist may use the title "certified registered nurse anesthetist," "CRNA," or "nurse anesthesiologist" and the title "advanced practice registered nurse" or "APRN." (f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict the authority of a health care facility to provide requirements for a certified registered nurse anesthetist practicing within the facility.